Illinois, session 104th, HB5060.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.2 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.2)7    Sec. 5-5.2. Payment. 8    (a) All nursing facilities that are grouped pursuant to 9Section 5-5.1 of this Act shall receive the same rate of 10payment for similar services.11    (b) It shall be a matter of State policy that the Illinois 12Department shall utilize a uniform billing cycle throughout 13the State for the long-term care providers.14    (c) (Blank). 15    (c-1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code, 16the methodologies for reimbursement of nursing services as 17provided under this Article shall no longer be applicable for 18bills payable for nursing services rendered on or after a new 19reimbursement system based on the Patient Driven Payment Model 20(PDPM) has been fully operationalized, which shall take effect 21for services provided on or after the implementation of the 22PDPM reimbursement system begins. For the purposes of Public 23Act 102-1035, the implementation date of the PDPM   HB5060- 2 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1reimbursement system and all related provisions shall be July 21, 2022 if the following conditions are met: (i) the Centers 3for Medicare and Medicaid Services has approved corresponding 4changes in the reimbursement system and bed assessment; and 5(ii) the Department has filed rules to implement these changes 6no later than June 1, 2022. Failure of the Department to file 7rules to implement the changes provided in Public Act 102-1035 8no later than June 1, 2022 shall result in the implementation 9date being delayed to October 1, 2022. 10    (d) The new nursing services reimbursement methodology 11utilizing the Patient Driven Payment Model, which shall be 12referred to as the PDPM reimbursement system, taking effect 13July 1, 2022, upon federal approval by the Centers for 14Medicare and Medicaid Services, shall be based on the 15following: 16        (1) The methodology shall be resident-centered, 17    facility-specific, cost-based, and based on guidance from 18    the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. 19        (2) Costs shall be annually rebased and case mix index 20    quarterly updated. The nursing services methodology will 21    be assigned to the Medicaid enrolled residents on record 22    as of 30 days prior to the beginning of the rate period in 23    the Department's Medicaid Management Information System 24    (MMIS) as present on the last day of the second quarter 25    preceding the rate period based upon the Assessment 26    Reference Date of the Minimum Data Set (MDS).   HB5060- 3 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1        (3) Regional wage adjustors based on the Health 2    Service Areas (HSA) groupings and adjusters in effect on 3    April 30, 2012 shall be included, except no adjuster shall 4    be lower than 1.06. 5        (4) PDPM nursing case mix indices in effect on March 6    1, 2022 shall be assigned to each resident class at no less 7    than 0.7858 of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 8    Services PDPM unadjusted case mix values, in effect on 9    March 1, 2022.10        (5) The pool of funds available for distribution by 11    case mix and the base facility rate shall be determined 12    using the formula contained in subsection (d-1). 13        (6) The Department shall establish a variable per diem 14    staffing add-on in accordance with the most recent 15    available federal staffing report, currently the Payroll 16    Based Journal, for the same period of time, and if 17    applicable adjusted for acuity using the same quarter's 18    MDS. The Department shall rely on Payroll Based Journals 19    provided to the Department of Public Health to make a 20    determination of non-submission. If the Department is 21    notified by a facility of missing or inaccurate Payroll 22    Based Journal data or an incorrect calculation of 23    staffing, the Department must make a correction as soon as 24    the error is verified for the applicable quarter.25        Beginning October 1, 2024, the staffing percentage 26    used in the calculation of the per diem staffing add-on   HB5060- 4 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1    shall be its PDPM STRIVE Staffing Ratio which equals: its 2    Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day 3    as published in the most recent federal staffing report 4    (the Provider Information File), divided by the facility's 5    PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target. Each facility's PDPM STRIVE 6    Staffing Target is equal to .82 times the facility's 7    Illinois Adjusted Facility Case-Mix Hours Per Resident Per 8    Day. A facility's Illinois Adjusted Facility Case Mix 9    Hours Per Resident Per Day is equal to its Case-Mix Total 10    Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 11    the most recent federal Provider Information file) times 12    3.662 (which reflects the national resident days-weighted 13    mean Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per 14    Day as calculated using the January 2024 federal Provider 15    Information Files), divided by the national resident 16    days-weighted mean Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per 17    Resident Per Day calculated using the most recent State US 18    Averages file.19        Beginning January 1, 2025, the staffing percentage 20    used in the calculation of the per diem staffing add-on 21    shall be its PDPM STRIVE Staffing Ratio which equals: its 22    Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day 23    as published in the most recent federal staffing report 24    (the Provider Information File), divided by the facility's 25    PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target. Each facility's PDPM STRIVE 26    Staffing Target is equal to .7122 times the facility's   HB5060- 5 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1    Illinois Adjusted Facility Case-Mix Hours Per Resident Per 2    Day. A facility's Illinois Adjusted Facility Case Mix 3    Hours Per Resident Per Day is equal to its Case-Mix Total 4    Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 5    the most recent federal staffing report Provider 6    Information file) times 3.79 (which is the Reported Total 7    Nurse Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day for the Nation 8    as reported the January 2024 State US Averages file), 9    divided by the Reported Total Nurse Staffing Hours Per 10    Resident Per Day for the Nation as reported in the most 11    recent State US Averages file. 12        (6.5) Beginning July 1, 2024, the paid per diem 13    staffing add-on shall be the paid per diem staffing add-on 14    in effect April 1, 2024. For dates beginning October 1, 15    2024 and through September 30, 2025, the denominator for 16    the staffing percentage shall be the lesser of the 17    facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing Target and:18            (A) For the quarter beginning October 1, 2024, the 19        sum of 20% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 20        Target and 80% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 21        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 22        the January 2024 federal staffing report).23            (B) For the quarter beginning January 1, 2025, the 24        sum of 40% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 25        Target and 60% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 26        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in   HB5060- 6 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1        the January 2024 federal staffing report).2            (C) For the quarter beginning March 1, 2025, the 3        sum of 60% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 4        Target and 40% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 5        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 6        the January 2024 federal staffing report).7            (D) For the quarter beginning July 1, 2025, the 8        sum of 80% of the facility's PDPM STRIVE Staffing 9        Target and 20% of the facility's Case-Mix Total Nurse 10        Staffing Hours Per Resident Per Day (as published in 11        the January 2024 federal staffing report). 12         Facilities with at least 70% of the staffing 13    indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a per diem 14    add-on of $9, increasing by equivalent steps for each 15    whole percentage point until the facilities reach a per 16    diem of $16.52. Facilities with at least 80% of the 17    staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a per 18    diem add-on of $16.52, increasing by equivalent steps for 19    each whole percentage point until the facilities reach a 20    per diem add-on of $25.77. Facilities with at least 92% of 21    the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be paid a 22    per diem add-on of $25.77, increasing by equivalent steps 23    for each whole percentage point until the facilities reach 24    a per diem add-on of $30.98. Facilities with at least 100% 25    of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall be 26    paid a per diem add-on of $30.98, increasing by equivalent   HB5060- 7 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1    steps for each whole percentage point until the facilities 2    reach a per diem add-on of $36.44. Facilities with at 3    least 110% of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study 4    shall be paid a per diem add-on of $36.44, increasing by 5    equivalent steps for each whole percentage point until the 6    facilities reach a per diem add-on of $38.68. Facilities 7    with at least 125% or higher of the staffing indicated by 8    the STRIVE study shall be paid a per diem add-on of $38.68. 9    No nursing facility's variable staffing per diem add-on 10    shall be reduced by more than 5% in 2 consecutive 11    quarters. For the quarters beginning July 1, 2022 and 12    October 1, 2022, no facility's variable per diem staffing 13    add-on shall be calculated at a rate lower than 85% of the 14    staffing indicated by the STRIVE study. No facility below 15    70% of the staffing indicated by the STRIVE study shall 16    receive a variable per diem staffing add-on after December 17    31, 2022. 18        (7) For dates of services beginning July 1, 2022, the 19    PDPM nursing component per diem for each nursing facility 20    shall be the product of the facility's (i) statewide PDPM 21    nursing base per diem rate, $92.25, adjusted for the 22    facility average PDPM case mix index calculated quarterly 23    and (ii) the regional wage adjuster, and then add the 24    Medicaid access adjustment as defined in (e-3) of this 25    Section. Transition rates for services provided between 26    July 1, 2022 and October 1, 2023 shall be the greater of   HB5060- 8 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1    the PDPM nursing component per diem or: 2            (A) for the quarter beginning July 1, 2022, the 3        RUG-IV nursing component per diem;4            (B) for the quarter beginning October 1, 2022, the 5        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 6        multiplied by 0.80 and the PDPM nursing component per 7        diem multiplied by 0.20;8            (C) for the quarter beginning January 1, 2023, the 9        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 10        multiplied by 0.60 and the PDPM nursing component per 11        diem multiplied by 0.40;12            (D) for the quarter beginning April 1, 2023, the 13        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 14        multiplied by 0.40 and the PDPM nursing component per 15        diem multiplied by 0.60;16            (E) for the quarter beginning July 1, 2023, the 17        sum of the RUG-IV nursing component per diem 18        multiplied by 0.20 and the PDPM nursing component per 19        diem multiplied by 0.80; or20            (F) for the quarter beginning October 1, 2023 and 21        each subsequent quarter, the transition rate shall end 22        and a nursing facility shall be paid 100% of the PDPM 23        nursing component per diem.24    (d-1) Calculation of base year Statewide RUG-IV nursing 25base per diem rate. 26        (1) Base rate spending pool shall be:   HB5060- 9 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1            (A) The base year resident days which are 2        calculated by multiplying the number of Medicaid 3        residents in each nursing home as indicated in the MDS 4        data defined in paragraph (4) by 365.5            (B) Each facility's nursing component per diem in 6        effect on July 1, 2012 shall be multiplied by 7        subsection (A).8            (C) Thirteen million is added to the product of 9        subparagraph (A) and subparagraph (B) to adjust for 10        the exclusion of nursing homes defined in paragraph 11        (5). 12        (2) For each nursing home with Medicaid residents as 13    indicated by the MDS data defined in paragraph (4), 14    weighted days adjusted for case mix and regional wage 15    adjustment shall be calculated. For each home this 16    calculation is the product of:17            (A) Base year resident days as calculated in 18        subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).19            (B) The nursing home's regional wage adjustor 20        based on the Health Service Areas (HSA) groupings and 21        adjustors in effect on April 30, 2012.22            (C) Facility weighted case mix which is the number 23        of Medicaid residents as indicated by the MDS data 24        defined in paragraph (4) multiplied by the associated 25        case weight for the RUG-IV 48 grouper model using 26        standard RUG-IV procedures for index maximization.  HB5060- 10 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1            (D) The sum of the products calculated for each 2        nursing home in subparagraphs (A) through (C) above 3        shall be the base year case mix, rate adjusted 4        weighted days.5        (3) The Statewide RUG-IV nursing base per diem rate:6            (A) on January 1, 2014 shall be the quotient of the 7        paragraph (1) divided by the sum calculated under 8        subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2);9            (B) on and after July 1, 2014 and until July 1, 10        2022, shall be the amount calculated under 11        subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (3) plus $1.76; and 12            (C) beginning July 1, 2022 and thereafter, $7 13        shall be added to the amount calculated under 14        subparagraph (B) of this paragraph (3) of this 15        Section. 16        (4) Minimum Data Set (MDS) comprehensive assessments 17    for Medicaid residents on the last day of the quarter used 18    to establish the base rate.19        (5) Nursing facilities designated as of July 1, 2012 20    by the Department as "Institutions for Mental Disease" 21    shall be excluded from all calculations under this 22    subsection. The data from these facilities shall not be 23    used in the computations described in paragraphs (1) 24    through (4) above to establish the base rate. 25    (e) Beginning July 1, 2014, the Department shall allocate 26funding in the amount up to $10,000,000 for per diem add-ons to   HB5060- 11 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1the RUGS methodology for dates of service on and after July 1, 22014:3        (1) $0.63 for each resident who scores in I4200 4    Alzheimer's Disease or I4800 non-Alzheimer's Dementia.5        (2) $2.67 for each resident who scores either a "1" or 6    "2" in any items S1200A through S1200I and also scores in 7    RUG groups PA1, PA2, BA1, or BA2.8    (e-1) (Blank).9    (e-2) For dates of services beginning January 1, 2014 and 10ending September 30, 2023, the RUG-IV nursing component per 11diem for a nursing home shall be the product of the statewide 12RUG-IV nursing base per diem rate, the facility average case 13mix index, and the regional wage adjustor. For dates of 14service beginning July 1, 2022 and ending September 30, 2023, 15the Medicaid access adjustment described in subsection (e-3) 16shall be added to the product. 17    (e-3) A Medicaid Access Adjustment of $4 adjusted for the 18facility average PDPM case mix index calculated quarterly 19shall be added to the statewide PDPM nursing per diem for all 20facilities with annual Medicaid bed days of at least 70% of all 21occupied bed days adjusted quarterly. For each new calendar 22year and for the 6-month period beginning July 1, 2022, the 23percentage of a facility's occupied bed days comprised of 24Medicaid bed days shall be determined by the Department 25quarterly. For dates of service beginning January 1, 2023, the 26Medicaid Access Adjustment shall be increased to $4.75. For   HB5060- 12 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1dates of service beginning January 1, 2027, the Medicaid 2Access Adjustment shall be increased by $5.75 to $10.50 per 3diem. Beginning January 1, 2027, facilities located outside of 4Rate Areas 6, 7, and 8 shall have the Medicaid percent of 5occupied bed days to be at least 60% of all occupied bed days 6adjusted quarterly to qualify for the Medicaid Access 7Adjustment. The remaining facilities shall have their 8threshold remain at 70%. This subsection shall be inoperative 9on and after January 1, 2028. 10    (e-4) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 112024, the Department shall increase the rate add-on at 12paragraph (7) subsection (a) under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 147.335 13for ventilator services from $208 per day to $481 per day. 14Payment is subject to the criteria and requirements under 89 15Ill. Adm. Code 147.335. 16    (f) (Blank).17    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, on 18and after July 1, 2012, for facilities not designated by the 19Department of Healthcare and Family Services as "Institutions 20for Mental Disease", rates effective May 1, 2011 shall be 21adjusted as follows:22        (1) (Blank);23        (2) (Blank);24        (3) Facility rates for the capital and support 25    components shall be reduced by 1.7%.26    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, on   HB5060- 13 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1and after July 1, 2012, nursing facilities designated by the 2Department of Healthcare and Family Services as "Institutions 3for Mental Disease" and "Institutions for Mental Disease" that 4are facilities licensed under the Specialized Mental Health 5Rehabilitation Act of 2013 shall have the nursing, 6socio-developmental, capital, and support components of their 7reimbursement rate effective May 1, 2011 reduced in total by 82.7%.9    (i) On and after July 1, 2014, the reimbursement rates for 10the support component of the nursing facility rate for 11facilities licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled 12or intermediate care facilities shall be the rate in effect on 13June 30, 2014 increased by 8.17%. 14    (i-1) Subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 152024, the reimbursement rates for the support component of the 16nursing facility rate for facilities licensed under the 17Nursing Home Care Act as skilled or intermediate care 18facilities shall be the rate in effect on June 30, 2023 19increased by 12%. 20    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject to 21federal approval, effective July 1, 2019, sufficient funds 22shall be allocated for changes to rates for facilities 23licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act as skilled nursing 24facilities or intermediate care facilities for dates of 25services on and after July 1, 2019: (i) to establish, through 26June 30, 2022 a per diem add-on to the direct care per diem   HB5060- 14 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1rate not to exceed $70,000,000 annually in the aggregate 2taking into account federal matching funds for the purpose of 3addressing the facility's unique staffing needs, adjusted 4quarterly and distributed by a weighted formula based on 5Medicaid bed days on the last day of the second quarter 6preceding the quarter for which the rate is being adjusted. 7Beginning July 1, 2022, the annual $70,000,000 described in 8the preceding sentence shall be dedicated to the variable per 9diem add-on for staffing under paragraph (6) of subsection 10(d); and (ii) in an amount not to exceed $170,000,000 annually 11in the aggregate taking into account federal matching funds to 12permit the support component of the nursing facility rate to 13be updated as follows:14        (1) 80%, or $136,000,000, of the funds shall be used 15    to update each facility's rate in effect on June 30, 2019 16    using the most recent cost reports on file, which have had 17    a limited review conducted by the Department of Healthcare 18    and Family Services and will not hold up enacting the rate 19    increase, with the Department of Healthcare and Family 20    Services. 21        (2) After completing the calculation in paragraph (1), 22    any facility whose rate is less than the rate in effect on 23    June 30, 2019 shall have its rate restored to the rate in 24    effect on June 30, 2019 from the 20% of the funds set 25    aside. 26        (3) The remainder of the 20%, or $34,000,000, shall be   HB5060- 15 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1    used to increase each facility's rate by an equal 2    percentage. 3    (k) During the first quarter of State Fiscal Year 2020, 4the Department of Healthcare of Family Services must convene a 5technical advisory group consisting of members of all trade 6associations representing Illinois skilled nursing providers 7to discuss changes necessary with federal implementation of 8Medicare's Patient-Driven Payment Model. Implementation of 9Medicare's Patient-Driven Payment Model shall, by September 1, 102020, end the collection of the MDS data that is necessary to 11maintain the current RUG-IV Medicaid payment methodology. The 12technical advisory group must consider a revised reimbursement 13methodology that takes into account transparency, 14accountability, actual staffing as reported under the 15federally required Payroll Based Journal system, changes to 16the minimum wage, adequacy in coverage of the cost of care, and 17a quality component that rewards quality improvements.18    (l) The Department shall establish per diem add-on 19payments to improve the quality of care delivered by 20facilities, including:21        (1) Incentive payments determined by facility 22    performance on specified quality measures in an initial 23    amount of $70,000,000. Nothing in this subsection shall be 24    construed to limit the quality of care payments in the 25    aggregate statewide to $70,000,000, and, if quality of 26    care has improved across nursing facilities, the   HB5060- 16 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1    Department shall adjust those add-on payments accordingly. 2    The quality payment methodology described in this 3    subsection must be used for at least State Fiscal Year 4    2023. Beginning with the quarter starting July 1, 2023, 5    the Department may add, remove, or change quality metrics 6    and make associated changes to the quality payment 7    methodology as outlined in subparagraph (E). Facilities 8    designated by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 9    Services as a special focus facility or a hospital-based 10    nursing home do not qualify for quality payments.11            (A) Each quality pool must be distributed by 12        assigning a quality weighted score for each nursing 13        home which is calculated by multiplying the nursing 14        home's quality base period Medicaid days by the 15        nursing home's star rating weight in that period.16            (B) Star rating weights are assigned based on the 17        nursing home's star rating for the LTS quality star 18        rating. As used in this subparagraph, "LTS quality 19        star rating" means the long-term stay quality rating 20        for each nursing facility, as assigned by the Centers 21        for Medicare and Medicaid Services under the Five-Star 22        Quality Rating System. The rating is a number ranging 23        from 0 (lowest) to 5 (highest).24                (i) Zero-star or one-star rating has a weight 25            of 0.26                (ii) Two-star rating has a weight of 0.75.  HB5060- 17 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1                (iii) Three-star rating has a weight of 1.5. 2                (iv) Four-star rating has a weight of 2.5.3                (v) Five-star rating has a weight of 3.5.4            (C) Each nursing home's quality weight score is 5        divided by the sum of all quality weight scores for 6        qualifying nursing homes to determine the proportion 7        of the quality pool to be paid to the nursing home. 8            (D) The quality pool is no less than $70,000,000 9        annually or $17,500,000 per quarter. The Department 10        shall publish on its website the estimated payments 11        and the associated weights for each facility 45 days 12        prior to when the initial payments for the quarter are 13        to be paid. The Department shall assign each facility 14        the most recent and applicable quarter's STAR value 15        unless the facility notifies the Department within 15 16        days of an issue and the facility provides reasonable 17        evidence demonstrating its timely compliance with 18        federal data submission requirements for the quarter 19        of record. If such evidence cannot be provided to the 20        Department, the STAR rating assigned to the facility 21        shall be reduced by one from the prior quarter. 22            (E) The Department shall review quality metrics 23        used for payment of the quality pool and make 24        recommendations for any associated changes to the 25        methodology for distributing quality pool payments in 26        consultation with associations representing long-term   HB5060- 18 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1        care providers, consumer advocates, organizations 2        representing workers of long-term care facilities, and 3        payors. The Department may establish, by rule, changes 4        to the methodology for distributing quality pool 5        payments. 6            (F) The Department shall disburse quality pool 7        payments from the Long-Term Care Provider Fund on a 8        monthly basis in amounts proportional to the total 9        quality pool payment determined for the quarter. 10            (G) The Department shall publish any changes in 11        the methodology for distributing quality pool payments 12        prior to the beginning of the measurement period or 13        quality base period for any metric added to the 14        distribution's methodology. 15        (2) Payments based on CNA tenure, promotion, and CNA 16    training for the purpose of increasing CNA compensation. 17    It is the intent of this subsection that payments made in 18    accordance with this paragraph be directly incorporated 19    into increased compensation for CNAs. As used in this 20    paragraph, "CNA" means a certified nursing assistant as 21    that term is described in Section 3-206 of the Nursing 22    Home Care Act, Section 3-206 of the ID/DD Community Care 23    Act, and Section 3-206 of the MC/DD Act. The Department 24    shall establish, by rule, payments to nursing facilities 25    equal to Medicaid's share of the tenure wage increments 26    specified in this paragraph for all reported CNA employee   HB5060- 19 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1    hours compensated according to a posted schedule 2    consisting of increments at least as large as those 3    specified in this paragraph. The increments are as 4    follows: an additional $1.50 per hour for CNAs with at 5    least one and less than 2 years' experience plus another 6    $1 per hour for each additional year of experience up to a 7    maximum of $6.50 for CNAs with at least 6 years of 8    experience. For purposes of this paragraph, Medicaid's 9    share shall be the ratio determined by paid Medicaid bed 10    days divided by total bed days for the applicable time 11    period used in the calculation. In addition, and additive 12    to any tenure increments paid as specified in this 13    paragraph, the Department shall establish, by rule, 14    payments supporting Medicaid's share of the 15    promotion-based wage increments for CNA employee hours 16    compensated for that promotion with at least a $1.50 17    hourly increase. Medicaid's share shall be established as 18    it is for the tenure increments described in this 19    paragraph. Qualifying promotions shall be defined by the 20    Department in rules for an expected 10-15% subset of CNAs 21    assigned intermediate, specialized, or added roles such as 22    CNA trainers, CNA scheduling "captains", and CNA 23    specialists for resident conditions like dementia or 24    memory care or behavioral health.25    (m) The Department shall work with nursing facility 26industry representatives to design policies and procedures to   HB5060- 20 -LRB104 19964 KTG 33414 b1permit facilities to address the integrity of data from 2federal reporting sites used by the Department in setting 3facility rates. 4(Source: P.A. 102-77, eff. 7-9-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 5102-1035, eff. 5-31-22; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23; 103-102, 6Article 40, Section 40-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-102, Article 50, 7Section 50-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 87-1-24; 103-1075, eff. 3-21-25.)